Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.075

Information to be provided to exclusive bargaining representative by certain employers.

RCW 41.56.035 applies to the following employers subject to this chapter:

(1) Western Washington University;

(2) Central Washington University;

(3) Eastern Washington University; and

(4) The Evergreen State College.

[ 2023 c 204 s 4.]